Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.125

Criminal defense training academy program—Expansion.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of public defense shall expand the capacity of its criminal defense training academy program to train practitioners who are new to public defense. The program must include and prioritize training for practitioners in underserved areas and rural areas of the state. The program must offer intensive trial skill development, incorporate public defense best practices and applicable standards, and offer networking opportunities. Trainings may incorporate in-person, remote, and recorded resources. By June 30, 2026, the office of public defense shall expand program offerings to also provide training to public defense practitioners who are seeking to achieve advanced qualifications.

[ 2024 c 293 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2024 c 293: See note following RCW 2.70.120.